src/morphology/incoming/verb_outer_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.OBJECTPERSON@ @D.PREFIX@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.ASPECT.IPFV@ @U.ASPECT.PFV@ @U.ASPECT.POT@ @U.ASPECT.PROG@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @U.PREFIX.OUTER@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.%0i@ @U.TAMA.%0s@ @U.TAMA.i@ @U.TAMA.ii@ @U.TAMA.is@ @U.TAMA.isi@ @U.TAMA.isii@ @U.TAMA.isis@ @U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.nii@ @U.TAMA.nis@ @U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.sii@ @U.TAMA.sis@ @U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yi@ @U.TAMA.yii-a@ @U.TAMA.yii@ @U.TAMA.yis-y@ @U.TAMA.yis@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.%0@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.i@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.a@

LEXICON Root
@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.PREFIX.OUTER@ DO ;
! @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.PREFIX.OUTER@dà  #;
! @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@                   #;
! @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@                                       #;

! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.PREFIX.OUTER@dà    #;
! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@     #;
! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.PREFIX.OUTER@dà     #;
! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@      #;
! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.PREFIX.OUTER@dà     #;
! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@      #;
! @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON DO

@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@s%< 	   	#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@n%< 	   	#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@w%< 	   	#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@y%< 	   	#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.DU@naxı%<     #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@go%<  	    #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@naxı%<     #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@gı%<  	    #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ye%<		#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.i@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ʔ%<    	#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.a@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@go%<    	#;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.%0@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@%<   		#; 
